Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.240

Notice—Contents.

The form of the notice of infraction issued under this chapter shall include the following:

(1) A statement that the notice represents a determination that the infraction has been committed by the contractor named in the notice and that the determination shall be final unless contested as provided in this chapter;

(2) A statement that the infraction is a noncriminal offense for which imprisonment shall not be imposed as a sanction;

(3) A statement of the violation which necessitated issuance of the infraction;

(4) A statement of penalty involved if the infraction is established;

(5) A statement of the options provided in this chapter for responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these options;

(6) A statement that at any hearing to contest the notice of infraction the state has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the infraction was committed; and that the contractor may subpoena witnesses, including the compliance inspector of the department who issued and served the notice of infraction;

(7) A statement that at any hearing to contest the notice of infraction against an unregistered contractor, the unregistered contractor has the burden of proving that the infraction did not occur;

(8) A statement that the contractor must respond to the notice of infraction in one of the ways provided in this chapter; and

(9) A statement that a contractor's failure to timely select one of the options for responding to the notice of infraction after receiving a statement of the options provided in this chapter for responding to the notice of infraction and the procedures necessary to exercise these options is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and may be punished by a fine or imprisonment in jail.

[ 2007 c 436 s 13; 2006 c 270 s 8; 1986 c 197 s 4; 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 2: See note following RCW 18.27.200.